Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201283-924
Assistant director; duties, powers,
and responsibilities.

Subject to the supervision and approval
of the Director of Correctional Services, each assistant director shall have
the following duties, powers, and responsibilities:

(1) To coordinate and direct all programs and facilities under his or
her jurisdiction;

(2) To select and manage such staff and supervise the operation of such
equipment as he or she may require;

(3) To make such revisions to internal systems in each division as may
be necessary to promote economy and facilitate maximum utilization of existing
correctional services and facilities;

(4) To cause any existing program and facilities to be utilized by or
merged with those of any other division in order to provide for greater efficiency
or achieve any economic advantage;

(5) To provide the Legislature and the Governor technical assistance,
advice, and information concerning administrative operations within his or
her division;

(6) To provide the Legislature and the Governor with recommendations
for dealing with financial, management, and organization problems affecting
his or her division. The recommendations
submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically;
and

(7) To exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper
in carrying out his or her responsibilities.

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 71;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 218.